Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-307
Cattle drover; driving off another's livestock; liability.

When the stock of any person shall be driven off its range within Nebraska against his will by the drovers of any drove, and the same shall be found in such drove, every person engaged as drover of such drove shall be liable for damages to the party injured to the amount of the full value of the animal for each head so driven off, together with all costs accruing in the trial of the cause, and the herd of stock shall be liable for the same, or a sufficient number to cover all damages and costs.

Laws 1879, § 6, p. 69;

R.S.1913, § 101;

C.S.1922, § 109;

C.S.1929, § 54-306;

R.S.1943, § 54-307.